Massachusetts, session 194th, H4665.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The third paragraph of section 1D of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2018 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the second sentence the following
sentence:- The standards shall include sufficient instruction on the histories, roles, and
contributions of lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer people in the history of this
country and this Commonwealth.
of 1